Hawaii statutes.
[§161-25] Slaughter, processing,
transportation, and selling. No person shall, with respect to any poultry
or poultry product:

(1) Slaughter any such poultry or process any such
poultry or poultry products which are capable of use as human food, at any
establishment processing such poultry or poultry products solely for intrastate
commerce, except in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(2) Sell, transport, offer for sale or
transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, (A) any
such poultry or poultry products which are capable of use as human food, and
are adulterated or misbranded at the time of such sale, transportation, offer
for sale or transportation, or receipt for transportation; or (B) any poultry
or poultry products required to be inspected under this chapter unless they
have been so inspected and passed.

(3) Do, with respect to any such poultry or poultry
products which are capable of use as human food, any act while they are being
transported in intrastate commerce or held for sale after such transportation,
which is intended to cause or has the effect of causing such poultry or poultry
product to be adulterated or misbranded. [L 1969, c 212, §17]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next